District of Columbia statutes.
47-2353

Auditing.

The Mayor shall adopt audit procedures consistent with the IFTA to review the uniform mileage schedules and fleet records of apportioned operators that declare the District their jurisdictional base. The audit procedures shall involve at least 15% of the IFTA apportioned vehicles whose operators declare the District as their jurisdictional base over a 5-year period.

Sept. 18, 1998, D.C. Law 12-153, § 2(d), 45 DCR 3853

History

1981 Ed., § 47-2353.

Prior Codifications